Alaska statutes. Title 42. Public Utilities and Carriers and Energy Programs.
Article 5. Accounts, Records, and Reports.

Collateral references. —

64 Am. Jur. 2d, Public Utilities, § 235.

Sec. 42.05.451.
System of accounts and reports.

The commission may classify the public utilities under its jurisdiction and prescribe a uniform system of accounts for each class and the manner in which the accounts and supporting records shall be kept.

A public utility shall maintain its accounts on a calendar year basis unless specifically authorized by the commission to maintain its accounts on a fiscal year basis. Within 90 days after the close of its authorized annual accounting period, or additional time granted upon a showing of good cause, a public utility shall file with the commission a verified annual report of its operations during the period reported, on forms prescribed by the commission.

History.

(§ 6 ch 113 SLA 1970)

Administrative Code. —

For practice before the commission, see 3 AAC 48, art. 1.

For utility and pipeline tariffs, see 3 AAC 48, art. 2.

For cost-of-service study and rate design information for electric utilities, see 3 AAC 48, art. 3.

For water and wastewater utilities, see 3 AAC 52, art. 8.

For criteria for the provision of private pay telephone service, see 3 AAC 53, art. 10.

Sec. 42.05.460.
[Repealed, § 5 ch 113 SLA 1970.]

Sec. 42.05.461.
Continuing property records.

The commission may require a public utility to establish, provide, and maintain as a part of its system of accounts, continuing property records segregated by the year of placement in service, including a list or inventory of all the units of tangible property used or useful in the public service, identifying the property by location and project. The commission may require a public utility to keep accounts and records in a manner that shows the original cost of the property when first devoted to the public service, and the current related reserve for depreciation. A public utility with annual revenues exceeding $100,000 shall keep continuing property records.

History.

(§ 6 ch 113 SLA 1970; am § 3 ch 140 SLA 1990)

Administrative Code. —

For gas utilities, see 3 AAC 52, art. 1.

Sec. 42.05.470.
[Repealed, § 5 ch 113 SLA 1970.]

Sec. 42.05.471.
Depreciation rates and accounts.

To provide for the loss in service value of its property, not restored by current maintenance, a utility shall charge adequate, but not excessive, depreciation expense for each major class of utility property used and useful in serving the public. From time to time the commission shall determine the proper and adequate rates of depreciation for each major class of property of a public utility. The commission shall accept rates of depreciation and depreciation accounts prescribed and maintained under regulations of a federal agency or the terms of a bond ordinance. The commission shall determine and allow depreciation expense in fixing the rates, tolls, and charges to be paid for the services of a public utility.

The commission is not bound in rate proceedings to accept, as just and reasonable for rate-making purposes, estimates of annual or accrued depreciation established under the provisions of this section, or to allow annual or accrued depreciation on utility property directly or indirectly contributed by customers or others.

History.

(§ 6 ch 113 SLA 1970)

Administrative Code. —

For utility and pipeline tariffs, see 3 AAC 48, art. 2.

Sec. 42.05.480.
[Repealed, § 5 ch 113 SLA 1970.]

Sec. 42.05.481.
Separate Business Accounts.

A public utility engaged, directly or indirectly, in another business, including another utility business or a subsidiary business, shall keep separate accounts relating to that business.
Except as the commission provides, property, expense, or revenue used in or derived from that business may not be considered in establishing the rates and charges of the utility for its public services.

History.

(§ 6 ch 113 SLA 1970)

Sec. 42.05.490.
[Repealed, § 5 ch 113 SLA 1970.]

Sec. 42.05.491.
Records and accounts to be kept in state.

A public utility shall keep the books, accounts, papers, and records required by the commission in an office within this state, and may not remove them from the state, except upon the terms and conditions that may be prescribed by the commission.
The provisions of this section do not apply to a public utility whose accounts are kept at its principal place of business outside the state, in the manner prescribed by a federal regulatory body; however, such a public utility shall at its option, either furnish to the commission, within a reasonable time fixed by the commission, certified copies of its books, accounts, papers, and records relating to the business done by the public utility within this state, or agree to pay the actual expenses incurred by the commission in sending personnel to examine the utility’s books and records at the place where they are kept.

History.

(§ 6 ch 113 SLA 1970)

Administrative Code. —

For practice before the commission, see 3 AAC 48, art. 1.

For applications generally, see 3 AAC 48, art. 4.

Sec. 42.05.500.
[Repealed, § 5 ch 113 SLA 1970.]

Sec. 42.05.501.
Inspection of books and records.

The commission shall at all reasonable times have access to, and may designate any of its employees, agents, or consultants to inspect and examine, the accounts, records, books, maps, inventories, appraisals, valuations, or other reports and documents, kept by public utilities or their affiliated interests, or prepared or kept for them by others, that relate to any contract or transaction between them. The commission may require a public utility or its affiliated interest to file with the commission copies of any or all of these accounts, records, books, maps, inventories, appraisals, valuations, or other reports and documents.

When participating as a party under AS

42.04.070(c)

or AS

44.23.020(e)

, the attorney general shall, at all reasonable times, have the right to reasonable access to, and may designate any of the attorney general’s employees, agents, or consultants to inspect and examine, the accounts, records, books, maps, inventories, appraisals, valuations, or other reports and documents kept by public utilities that are relevant to the issues presented in any adjudicatory matter before the commission in which the attorney general has appeared as a party under AS

42.04.070(c)

or AS

44.23.020(e)

. This access is subject to reasonable notice to all parties with an opportunity to object before the commission. Included under this subsection is access to records or other documents under the custody or control of an affiliated interest of a public utility that relate to any contract or transaction between the public utility and the affiliated interest.

History.

(§ 6 ch 113 SLA 1970; am § 5 ch 98 SLA 2004)

Administrative Code. —

For practice before the commission, see 3 AAC 48, art. 1.

For gas utilities, see 3 AAC 52, art. 1.

For electric utilities, see 3 AAC 52, art. 5.

For criteria for the provision of private pay telephone service, see 3 AAC 53, art. 10.

Collateral references. —

73B C.J.S., Public Utilities, § 54.

Sec. 42.05.510.
[Repealed, § 5 ch 113 SLA 1970.]